Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 107.728 is amended to read:
107.728. (1) A petition under ORS 107.710 may be filed [ only in a county in which the petitioner
or respondent resides ] in a county in which:
(a) The petitioner resides;
(b) The respondent resides; or
(c) The abuse occurred .
(2) Any  contempt proceedings for violation of a restraining order issued under ORS 107.700 to
107.735 must be conducted by the court that issued the order, or by the circuit court  for a county
in which a violation of  the restraining order occurs. If contempt proceedings are initiated in the
circuit court for a county in which a violation of  the restraining order occurs, the person initiating
the contempt proceedings shall file with the court a copy of the restraining order, certified  by the
clerk of the court that issued the order. Upon filing of the certified  copy of the restraining order,
the court shall enforce the order as though that court had issued the order.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 124.012 is amended to read:
124.012. (1) A petition under ORS 124.010 may be filed [ only in a county in which the petitioner
or respondent resides ] in a county in which:
(a) The petitioner resides;
(b) The respondent resides; or
(c) The abuse occurred .
(2) Any  contempt proceedings for violation of a restraining order issued under ORS 124.005 to
124.040 must be conducted by the court that issued the order, or by the circuit court  for a county
in which a violation of  the restraining order occurs. If contempt proceedings are initiated in the
circuit court for a county in which a violation of  the restraining order occurs, the person initiating
the contempt proceedings shall file with the court a copy of the restraining order, certified  by the
clerk of the court that issued the order. Upon filing of the certified  copy of the restraining order,
the court shall enforce the order as though that court had issued the order.
Enrolled House Bill 4146 (HB 4146-A) Page 1
SECTION 3.  ORS 163.763 is amended to read:
163.763. (1) A person  who has been subjected to sexual abuse and who reasonably fears for the
person’s physical safety may petition the circuit court for a restraining order if:
(a) The person and the respondent are not family or household members;
(b) The respondent is at least 18 years of age; and
(c) The respondent is not prohibited from  contacting the person pursuant to a foreign restrain-
ing order as defined in ORS  24.190, an order issued under ORS 30.866, 124.015, 124.020, 163.738 or
419B.845 or an order entered in a criminal action.
(2)(a) A petition seeking relief under ORS 163.760 to 163.777 must be  filed in the circuit court
for the county in which  the petitioner or the respondent resides  or in which the abuse occurred .
The petition may be  filed, without the appointment of a guardian ad litem, by a person who is at
least 12 years of age or by a parent or lawful guardian of a person who is under 18 years of age.
(b) The petition must allege that:
(A) The petitioner  reasonably fears for the petitioner’s physical safety with respect to the re-
spondent; and
(B) The respondent subjected the petitioner to sexual abuse.
(c) The petition must include allegations made under oath  or affirmation or a declaration under
penalty of perjury.
(d) The petitioner has the  burden of proving a claim under ORS 163.760 to 163.777 by a pre-
ponderance of the evidence.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 163.472 is amended to read:
163.472. (1) A person commits the crime of unlawful dissemination of an intimate image if:
(a) The  person, with the intent to harass, humiliate or injure another person, knowingly causes
to be disclosed an [ identifiable] image of the other person whose intimate parts  are visible or who
is engaged in sexual conduct;
(b) The person knows or reasonably should have known that the other person does not consent
to the disclosure;
(c) The other person is harassed, humiliated or injured by the disclosure; and
(d) A reasonable person would be harassed, humiliated or injured by the disclosure.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, unlawful dissemination  of an inti-
mate image is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful dissemination of an intimate image is a Class C felony if the person has  a prior
conviction under this section at the time of the offense.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Disclose” includes,  but is not limited to, transfer, publish, distribute, exhibit, advertise and
offer.
[(b) “Identifiable” means that a reasonable person would be able  to recognize the individual de-
picted in the image as the other person. ]
[(c)] (b)  “Image” includes, but is not limited to, a photograph, film, videotape, recording, digital
picture and other visual reproduction, regardless of the manner in which the image is stored.
[(d)] (c)  “Information content provider” has the meaning given that term in 47 U.S.C. 230(f).
[(e)] (d) “Interactive computer service” has the meaning given that term in 47 U.S.C. 230(f).
[(f)] (e)  “Intimate parts” means uncovered human genitals, pubic areas or female nipples.
[(g)] (f)  “Sexual conduct” means sexual intercourse or oral or anal sexual intercourse, as those
terms are defined in ORS 163.305, or masturbation.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Activity by law enforcement agencies investigating and prosecuting criminal offenses;
(b) Legitimate medical, scientific or educational activities;
(c) Legal proceedings,  when disclosure is consistent with common practice in civil proceedings
or necessary for the proper functioning of the criminal justice system;
(d) The reporting of unlawful conduct to a law enforcement agency;
(e) Disclosures that serve a lawful public interest;
Enrolled House Bill 4146 (HB 4146-A) Page 2
(f) Disclosures of images:
(A) Depicting  the other person voluntarily displaying, in a public area, the other person’s inti-
mate parts or engaging in sexual conduct; or
(B) Originally created for a commercial purpose with the consent of the other person; or
(g) The provider of an  interactive computer service for an image of intimate parts provided by
an information content provider.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 107.728, 124.012 and 163.763 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2024 Act become operative on July 1, 2024.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4146 (HB 4146-A) Page 3